Massachusetts, session 194th, H1604.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26 of Chapter 218 of the General Laws, as amended by St.2018, c. 69, §109, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words “of chapter two hundred and sixty-six,” the
following language: “subsections (b) and (c) of section fourteen of chapter two hundred and
sixty-nine”.
of 1